da: Analysestof målt: Kolesterol; Glukose; Glukose og keton; Keton; Urinsyre; Andet
lt-LT: Matuojamas analitas: Cholesterolis; Gliukozė; Gliukozė ir ketonai; Ketonai; Šlapimo rūgštis; Kita
sl-SI: Merjen analit: Holesterol; Glukoza; Glukoza in keton; Keton; Sečna kislina; Drugo
ro-RO: Analit măsurat: Colesterol; Glucoză; Glucoză și cetonă; Cetonă; Acid uric; Altele
en: Analyte measured: Cholesterol; Glucose; Glucose and ketone; Ketone; Uric acid; Other
it: Analita misurato: Colesterolo; Glucosio; Glucosio e chetoni; Chetoni; Acido urico; Altro
hr-HR: Izmjereni analit: Kolesterol; Glukoza; Glukoza i keton; Keton; Mokraćna kiselina; Ostalo
de: Gemessener Analyt: Cholesterin; Glukose; Glukose und Keton; Keton; Harnsäure; Sonstiges
ja: 測定される分析物: コレステロール; グルコース; グルコース＆ケトン; ケトン; 尿酸; その他
fr: Analyte mesuré: Cholestérol; Glucose; Glucose et cétone; Cétone; Acide urique; Autre
sv: Mätt analyt: Kolesterol; Glukos; Glukos och keton; Keton; Urinsyra; Övrigt
sk-SK: Meraný analyt: Cholesterol; Glukóza; Glukóza a ketóny; Ketóny; Kyselina močová; Iné
pt-PT: Analito medido: Colesterol; Glicose; Glicose e cetona; Cetona; Ácido úrico; Outro
ko: 측정된 분석물: 콜레스테롤; 포도당; 포도당 및 케톤; 케톤; 요산; 기타
th: สารที่วัด: คอเลสเตอรอล; น้ำตาลกลูโคส; น้ำตาลกลูโคสและคีโตน; คีโตน; กรดยูริก; อื่นๆ
hu: Mért analit: Koleszterin; Glükóz; Glükóz és keton; Keton; Húgysav; Egyéb
pt-BR: Analito medido: Colesterol; Glicose; Glicose e cetona; Cetona; Ácido úrico; Outro
ru: Измеряемый аналит: Холестерин; Глюкоза; Глюкоза и кетоны; Кетоны; Мочевая кислота; Другой
fi: Mitattu analyytti: Kolesteroli; Glukoosi; Glukoosi ja ketoni; Ketoni; Virtsahappo; Muu
pl: Analit mierzony: Cholesterol; Glukoza; Glukoza i ketony; Ketony; Kwas moczowy; Inne
bg-BG: Измерен аналит: Холестерол; Глюкоза; Глюкоза и кетони; Кетони; Пикочна киселина; Други
es: Analito medido: Colesterol; Glucosa; Glucosa y cetonas; Cetonas; Ácido úrico; Otros
vi: Chất phân tích được đo: Cholesterol; Glucose; Glucose và ketone; Ketone; Axit uric; Khác
tr: Ölçülen analit: Kolesterol; Glikoz; Glikoz ve keton; Keton; Ürik asit; Diğer
nl: Gemeten analyt: Cholesterol; Glucose; Glucose en ketonen; Ketonen; Urinezuur; Andere
zh-TW: 測量的分析物: 膽固醇; 血糖; 血糖和酮體; 酮體; 尿酸; 其他
zh-CN: 测量的分析物: 胆固醇; 葡萄糖; 葡萄糖和酮体; 酮体; 尿酸; 其他
el: Αναλύτης που μετράται: Χοληστερίνη; Γλυκόζη; Γλυκόζη και κετόνες; Κετόνες; Ουρικό οξύ; Άλλο
nb: Analytt målt: Kolesterol; Glukose; Glukose og keton; Keton; Urinsyre; Annet
cs: Měřený analyt: Cholesterol; Glukóza; Glukóza a keton; Keton; Kyselina močová; Jiné